Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5312
Violations; penalty; county attorney or Attorney General; action to assure compliance.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of sections 71-5301 to 71-5313 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and each day shall constitute a separate offense in cases of continued violation. It shall be the duty of the county attorney or the Attorney General, to whom the director reports a violation, to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted without delay to assure compliance with sections 71-5301 to 71-5313.

Laws 1976, LB 821, § 12;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 62.